Utah statutes.
17B-1-631.   District clerk -- Meetings and records.

(1)  The board of trustees of each local district shall appoint a district clerk. 

(2)  If required, the clerk may be chosen from among the members of the board of trustees, except the chair.

(3)  The district clerk or other appointed person shall attend the meetings and keep a record of the proceedings of the board of trustees.

